Hawaii, session 2026, SB3288.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $15,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of land and natural resources to: (1)  Demolish and remove the country club apartment building and related structures and utilities located at 121 Banyan Drive, Hilo, Hawaii, on the parcel designated as Tax Map key:  (3) 2-1-005:020; (2)  Grade the site and plant grass and sod following the demolition and removal; and (3)  Perform any other necessary work relating to the demolition and removal of the country club apartment building and related structures and utilities. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 2.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________